Washington statutes.
RCW 41.20.900

Construction—1959 c 6—Benefits retroactively authorized.

The provisions of *this act are intended to be remedial and procedural and any benefits heretofore paid to recipients hereunder pursuant to any previous act are retroactively included and authorized as a part of *this act.

[ 1959 c 6 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: "this act" appears in chapter 6, Laws of 1959, which reenacted RCW 41.20.050, 41.20.060, and 41.20.080. These sections were subsequently amended by chapter 78, Laws of 1959.